District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2851.14

Certain professional licenses exempt.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(j), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2851.14.